Wisconsin, session 2025, AB30.
do enact as follows:AB30,11Section 1. 710.02 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 710.02 (1r) and amended 2to read:AB30,2,63710.02 (1r) Limitation. The following persons may not acquire, own, or hold 4any interest, directly or indirectly, except an interest used to secure repayment of a 5debt incurred in good faith, in more than 640 acres of land in this state in excess of 6the following amounts:AB30,2,87(a) Aliens Except as provided in par. (d), aliens not residents of a state of the 8United States, not more than 640 acres.AB30,2,119(b) Corporations Except as provided in par. (d), corporations not created under 10the laws of the United States or a state of the United States, not more than 640 11acres.AB30,3,212(c) 1. Corporations Except as provided in par. (d), corporations, limited 13liability companies, partnerships, or associations having more than 20 percent of 1their stock, securities, or other indicia of ownership held or owned by persons under 2par. (a) or (b), not more than 640 acres.AB30,3,532. Trusts Except as provided in par. (d), trusts having more than 20 percent of 4the value of their assets held for the benefit of persons under par. (a) or (b), not more 5than 640 acres.AB30,26Section 2. 710.02 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:AB30,3,117710.02 (1g) Definition. In this section, “foreign adversary” means a foreign 8government or nongovernment person determined by the federal secretary of 9commerce to have engaged in a long-term pattern or serious instances of conduct 10significantly adverse to the national security of the United States or security and 11safety of U.S. persons.AB30,312Section 3. 710.02 (1r) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB30,3,1413710.02 (1r) (d) Foreign adversaries may not acquire, own, or hold any land in 14this state.AB30,415Section 4. 710.02 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB30,3,1716710.02 (2) Exceptions. (intro.) Except as provided in sub. (3), sub. (1) (1r) 17does not apply to:AB30,518Section 5. 710.02 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB30,4,419710.02 (3) Use of land restricted. Land in excess of 640 acres, acquired by 20a A person listed under sub. (1) (1r), other than a person listed under sub. (2) (a), 21(b), or (c), that acquires land in excess of the amount allowed under sub. (1r) for an 22activity listed under sub. (2) (d), (e), (f), or (g), may not be used directly or indirectly 23by that person use the land for any activity not listed under sub. (2) (d), (e), (f), or 1(g). Pending the conversion and development of the land for a purpose permitted 2allowed under sub. (2) (d), (e), (f), or (g), it the person may be used use the land for 3agriculture or forestry purposes under a lease to a person not subject to sub. (1) (1r). 4Products of the land may be sold by the lessee to the owner of the land.AB30,65Section 6. 710.02 (5) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB30,4,86710.02 (5) (a) (intro.) Interests exceeding 640 acres the amounts allowed 7under sub. (1r) that are acquired by persons under sub. (1) (1r) shall be divested at 8the discretion of the holder to comply with sub. (1) (1r) within 4 years after:AB30,79Section 7. 710.02 (5) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB30,4,1110710.02 (5) (a) 1. Acquiring the interest, if the interest is described under sub. 11(2) (a) and the person is subject to sub. (1) (1r) (a) or (b).AB30,812Section 8. 710.02 (5) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB30,4,1413710.02 (5) (a) 2. Acquiring the interest or becoming subject to sub. (1) (1r) (c), 14whichever is later, if the person is subject to sub. (1) (1r) (c).AB30,915Section 9. 710.02 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB30,4,1916710.02 (6) Forfeitures. Interests in lands in excess of 640 acres the amounts 17allowed under sub. (1r) that are acquired or held in violation of this section are 18forfeited to the state. The holder of the interest shall determine which lands are to 19be forfeited to comply with sub. (1) (1r).AB30,1020Section 10. 710.02 (9) of the statutes is renumbered 710.02 (9) (a) and 21amended to read:AB30,5,222710.02 (9) (a) This Except as provided in par. (b), this section applies to 1interests in land acquired after July 1, 1982. No interest acquired before July 1, 21982, is subject to divestiture or forfeiture under this section.AB30,113Section 11. 710.02 (9) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB30,5,104710.02 (9) (b) Subsection (1r) (d) applies to interests in land acquired by a 5foreign adversary on or after the first day of the first month beginning after the 6effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], or the date on which the 7federal secretary of commerce determines the person is a foreign adversary, 8whichever occurs later. No interest acquired by the foreign adversary before the 9date on which sub. (1r) (d) first applies, as specified in this paragraph, is subject to 10divestiture or forfeiture under this section.AB30,5,1111